Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska55-113
National Guard; drills; encampments; maneuvers.

Each organization shall assemble for drill and instruction, and participate in encampments, maneuvers and other exercises at such periods as may be prescribed by the Governor in accordance with the requirements of the laws or regulations of the United States.

Laws 1929, c. 189, § 23, p. 663;

C.S.1929, § 55-129;

R.S.1943, § 55-153;

Laws 1969, c. 459, § 11, p. 1584.